Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.110

Appraiser requirements.

(1) An appraisal management company may not knowingly contract with or employ as an appraiser:

(a) Any person who has ever had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser in this state, or in any other state, surrendered in lieu of disciplinary action, refused, denied, canceled, or revoked;

(b) Any person who has been convicted of an offense that reflects adversely upon the person's integrity, competence, or fitness to meet the responsibilities of an appraiser or appraisal management company;

(c) Any person who has been convicted of, or who has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony related to participation in the real estate or mortgage loan industry:

(i) During the seven-year period preceding the date of the application for licensing and registration; or

(ii) At any time preceding the date of application, if the felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust, or money laundering;

(d) Any person who is in violation of chapter 19.146 or 31.04 RCW; or

(e) Any person who is in violation of this chapter.

(2) An appraisal management company may not:

(a) Knowingly enter into any independent contractor arrangement for appraisal or appraisal review services with any person who has ever had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser in this state, or in any other state, surrendered in lieu of disciplinary action, refused, denied, canceled, or revoked; and

(b) Knowingly enter into any contract, agreement, or other business relationship for appraisal or appraisal review services with any entity that employs, has entered into an independent contractor arrangement, or has entered into any contract, agreement, or other business relationship with any person who has ever had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser in this state or in any other state surrendered in lieu of disciplinary action, refused, denied, canceled, or revoked.

(3) Any employee of the appraisal management company, or any contractor working in any capacity on behalf of the appraisal management company, that has any involvement in the actual performance of appraisal or appraisal review services, or review and analysis of completed appraisals must be a state licensed or state-certified appraiser in the state in which the property is located, and must have geographic and product competence. This requirement does not apply to any review or examination of the appraisal for grammatical, typographical, or similar errors or general reviews of the appraisal for completeness.

[ 2010 c 179 s 10.]